Massachusetts, session 194th, H3163.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended to add the following new 
subsection: 
B.(a) (17).  In addition to any other deduction from Part B income so-called, a taxpayer 
may deduct any fee paid to a municipality or public school district for the purpose of 
transportation for a student to or from a public school, participation by a student in an athletic, 
academic, enrichment or student activity program at a public school, or fee paid for the purpose 
of trash pickup or disposal, either paid directly to the municipality or for participation in a “pay 
as you throw” trash pickup program, so-called. The Commissioner of Revenue is authorized to 
promulgate regulations under this sub-section.